test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VTA_AM_CNJ_waabam_gt-norm.yaml
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+4+3PlO: waabmigwaagwenh #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl !cons
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlO: waabmigwaagwenh #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl !cons
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+4+3PlO: waabmigwegwenh #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl !book (this can't be right, eg is 2pl)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlO: waabmigwegwenh #0 v 3pl, 3obv v 3pl !book (this can't be right, eg is 2pl)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+4+3SgO:    waabmigoogwenh      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg !less anomalous than it seems, just lengthen igo in this context (compensatory lenghtenging?) (don't use igoo, that disrupts orderliness)
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgO:    waabmigoogwenh      #0 v 3sg, 3obv v 3sg !less anomalous than it seems, just lengthen igo in this context (compensatory lenghtenging?) (don't use igoo, that disrupts orderliness)

     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl+2SgO: waabmikwaawenh   #3pl v 2sg !cons (?)
     #waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl+2SgO: waabmikwaawen   #3pl v 2sg !book 
     waabmaa+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Sg+2SgO:    waabmikenh         #3sg v 2sg !hm no w4
